Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-126] Board of education;
qualifications; administration priorities. (a) Upon the nomination of any
board member, the governor shall provide written documentation articulating the
administration's goals and priorities with respect to the formation of a
highly-functioning, well-balanced board, and describing the nominee's
qualifications.

(b) Each nominee shall meet the following
minimum qualifications:

(1) Record of integrity, civic virtue, and high
ethical standards. Each nominee shall demonstrate integrity, civic virtue, and
high ethical standards and be willing to hold fellow board members to the same;

(2) Availability for constructive engagement. Each
nominee shall commit to being a conscientious and attentive board member;

(3) Knowledge of best practices. Each nominee shall
have an understanding of best practices in educational governance or shall be
willing to be trained in such; and

(4) Commitment to educational leadership. Each
nominee shall have a clear understanding of the board's role in developing and
protecting a clear, long-term strategic vision for Hawaii's public schools, and
shall understand the need to hold the superintendent of education accountable
for making consistent progress toward that vision.

(c) Each nominee shall ideally meet the
following recommended qualifications:

(1) Understanding of collective bargaining. Each
nominee should demonstrate an understanding of the collective bargaining
process and an ability to participate in that process on behalf of the board
free from any conflict of interest;

(2) Experience governing complex organizations. Each
nominee should possess experience with complex organizations and a proven
ability to function productively within them;

(3) Collaborative leadership ability. Each nominee
should have substantial leadership experience that ideally illustrates the
nominee's ability to function among diverse colleagues as an effective team
member, with the ability to articulate, understand, and help shape consensus
surrounding board policies; and

(4) Commitment to education. Each nominee's record
should demonstrate a deep and abiding interest in education and a dedication to
the social, academic, and character development of young people. [L 2011, c 5,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next